District of Columbia statutes.
5-1102

Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to establish an effective, efficient, and fair system of independent review of citizen complaints against police officers in the District of Columbia, which will:

(1)

Be visible to and easily accessible to the public;

(2)

Investigate promptly and thoroughly claims of police misconduct;

(3)

Encourage the mutually agreeable resolution of complaints through conciliation and mediation where appropriate;

(4)

Provide adequate due process protection to officers accused of misconduct;

(5)

Provide fair and speedy determination of cases that cannot be resolved through conciliation or mediation;

(6)

Render just determinations;

(7)

Foster increased communication and understanding and reduce tension between the police and the public; and

(8)

Improve the public safety and welfare of all persons in the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-208, § 3, 45 DCR 8107

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-912.